src/phonology/nds-phon.twolc
!! ================================================== !
!! The Low German morphophonological/twolc rules file !
!! ================================================== !

Alphabet
 a b c d e f g h i j k l m n o p q r s t u v w x y z æ ø å
 á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ä ë ö ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý þ ñ ð ß ç

 A B C D E F G H I J K L M N O P Q R S T U V W X Y Z Æ Ø Å
 Á É Ó Ú Í À È Ò Ù Ì Ä Ë Ö Ü Ï Â Ê Ô Û Î Ã Ý þ Ñ Ð

! for the i-umlaut of å and the u-umlaut of a
%{åöä%}:å
%{Øäö%}:0
%{aö%}:a
%{Øä%}:0

! for the the ablaut grades of the strong verb classes, the ordering of the letters roughly follows the ablaut grades
! long ablaut grade 1 as default
%{eiØ%}:0 !! strong verb class 1 1st part
%{yaØ%}:y !! strong verb class 1 2nd part
%{eouü%}:e !! strong verb class 2a 1st part
%{Øeua%}:e !! strong verb class 2a 2nd part
%{uüØ%}:u !! strong verb class 2b 1st part
%{uaØ%}:u !! strong verb class 2b 2nd part
%{iua%}:i !! strong verb class 3a 
%{eoa%}:e !! strong verb class 3bc
%{iaeo%}:i !! strong verb class 4a 1st part
%{aeØ%}:a !! strong verb class 4ab 2nd part
%{eiao%}:e !! strong verb class 4b 1st part
%{eio%}:e !! strong verb class 4c 1st part
%{aØo%}:a !! strong verb class 4c 2nd part 
%{iae%}:i !! strong verb class 5a 1st part 
%{aeØ%}:a !! strong verb class 5ab 2nd part
%{eia%}:e !! strong verb class 5b 1st part


!! TRIGGERS
%^CC2C:0 !!≈ * @CODE@  for Deleting second consonant in orthographic geminate
%^VV2V:0 !!≈ * @CODE@  for Orthographic vowel deletion in open syllable
%^IUML:0 !!≈ * @CODE@  for i-umlaut
%^UUML:0 !!≈ * @CODE@  for u-umlaut
! %^ABL1O:0  !!≈ * @CODE@  for ablaut grade 1 in open syllable (ablaut grade 1 in closed syllable used as default) -- probably not needed, can be resolved by using %^VV2V
%^ABL1NL:0  !!≈ * @CODE@  for non-lengthened ablaut grade 1 in class 4 and 5 in some southern dialects, ABL1 = ablaut grade 1, NL = non-lengthened
! Historically short vowels in open syllable where lengthened. However, this lengthening did not happen in all instances. Especially in several southern dialects, the short vowel has been preserved, therefore "non-lengthened".
%^ABL1S:0  !!≈ * @CODE@  for shortened ablaut grade 1 in 2nd and 3rd sg. of present tense, S = shortened
! In Middle Low Saxon, the vowel of the 2nd and 3rd sg. was shortened before double consonants. 
%^ABL2:0  !!≈ * @CODE@  for ablaut grade 2 in preterite, ABL2 = ablaut grade 2
%^ABL2W:0  !!≈ * @CODE@  for specific preterite forms in Westphalian dialects, W = Westphalian
! Some Westphalian dialects, like those from Eastern Westphalia and the Sauerland, have preserved a vowel distinction between 1st and 3rd sg. vs. 2nd sg. and pl. 
%^ABL2U:0  !!≈ * @CODE@  for irregular umlaut of ablaut grade 2 in class 4a,b and 5, U = (irregular) umlaut
%^ABL3:0  !!≈ * @CODE@  for long ablaut grade 3 in perfect participle
%^ABL3NL:0  !!≈ * @CODE@  for short ablaut grade 3 in some southern dialects, NL = non-lengthened 


 %> ;

Sets

 Vow = a e i o u y æ ø å 
       á é ó ú í à è ò ù ì ä ë ö ü ï â ê ô û î ã ý ;
 Cns = b c d f g h j k l m n p q r s t v w x z ð þ ;
 
Rules

"Deleting s before suffix -st"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __
 s:0 <=>      _ %> s  ;

!!€ leas%>st
!!€ lea0%>st

!!$ leas%>st
!!$ leas%>st
      s _ %^CC2C: ;



"Deleting t before suffix -t"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __
 t:0 <=>      _ %> t  ;

!!achten+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ____
!!€ acht%>t
!!€ ach0%>t

!!$ acht%>t
!!$ acht%>t

   t _ %^CC2C: ;

"Orthographic vowel deletion in open syllable"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __
 Vx:0 <=>      Vx _ Cns %^VV2V: ;
        where Vx in (a e o u ä ö ü) ;

!! maken+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1
!!€ maak%^VV2V%>e
!!€ ma0k0%>e

!!$ maak%^VV2V%>e
!!$ maak0%>e
		
"Orthographic consonant deletion in closed syllable"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __
 Cx:0 <=>      Cx _ %^CC2C: ;
        where Cx in (b d f g k l m n p r v) ;
!        where Cx in (b d f g k l m n p r s t v) ;

!! tellen+V+PrfPrc 
!!€ tell%^CC2C>d
!!€ tel00%>d

!!$ tell%^CC2C>d
!!$ tell0%>d

"Plural assimilation"
d:n <=> n _ %> Vow ;
! to be generalised

"I-umlaut for short vowels in closed syllable or long vowels in open syllable"
!! __@RULENAME@__ 
 Vx:Vy <=> _ Cns:* Vow:* Cns:* %^IUML: ; 
     where Vx in ( a o u )
           Vy in ( ä ö ü )
           matched ;

!! sak+N+Pl+Nom: __seahkka/pussi/bag__
!!€ sakk%^IUML%>e
!!€ säkk0%>e

!!$ sakk%^IUML%>e 
!!$ sakk0%>e 

!! slag+N+Pl+NOM: __časkin/lyönti/hit__
!!€ slag%^IUML%>e
!!€ släg0%>e

!!$ slag%^IUML%>e
!!$ slag0%>e

!! holt+N+Pl+Nom: __muorra/puu/wood__
!!€ holt%^IUML%>er 
!!€ hölt0%>er

!!$ holt%^IUML%>er 
!!$ holt0%>er

!! broder+N+Pl+Nom: __viellja/veli/brother__
!!€ broder%^IUML%>s 
!!€ bröder0%>s

!!$ broder%^IUML%>s 
!!$ broder0%>s

!! busk+N+Pl+Nom: __miestta/pensas/bush__
!!€ busk%^IUML%>e 
!!€ büsk0%>e

!!$ busk%^IUML%>e
!!$ busk0%>e

!2019-01-18a!"I-umlaut for long vowels in closed syllable"
!2019-01-18a!!! __@RULENAME@__ 
!2019-01-18a! Vx:Vy <=> Vx:Vy _ Cns:* Vow:* Cns:* %^IUML: ; 
!2019-01-18a!           _   Vx:Vy Cns:* Vow:* Cns:* (%^VV2V:) %^IUML: ;
!2019-01-18a!     where Vx in ( a o u )
!2019-01-18a!           Vy in ( ä ö ü )
!2019-01-18a!           matched ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!! maagd+N+Pl+Nom: __biigá/piika/maid__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ maagd%^IUML%>e
!2019-01-18a!!!€ määgd0%>e
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ maagd%^IUML%>e
!2019-01-18a!!!$ maagd0%>e
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ maagd%^IUML%>e
!2019-01-18a!!!$ mäagd0%>e
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!! woord+N+Pl+Nom: __sátni/sana/word__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ woord%^IUML%>e
!2019-01-18a!!!€ wöörd0%>e
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ woord%^IUML%>e
!2019-01-18a!!!$ woord0%>e
!2019-01-18a! 
!2019-01-18a!!! vuust+N+Pl+Nom: __čorbma/nyrkki/fist__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ vuust%^IUML%>e
!2019-01-18a!!!€ vüüst0%>e 
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ vuust%^IUML%>e
!2019-01-18a!!!$ vuust0%>e
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"I-umlaut for å" 
!2019-01-18a!!! __@RULENAME@__ 
!2019-01-18a! %{åöä%}:ö <=> _ %{0äö%}: Cns:* %^IUML: ; 
!2019-01-18a!           matched ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Double marking of i-umlaut for å"
!2019-01-18a!!! __@RULENAME@__ 
!2019-01-18a! %{0äö%}:ä <=> ö _ Cns:* %^IUML: ;
!2019-01-18a!           matched ; 
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!! råd+N+Pl+Nom: __ráđđi/neuvo/council__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ r%{åöä%}%{0äö%}d%^IUML%>e
!2019-01-18a!!!€ röäd0%>e
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ r%{åöä%}%{0äö%}d%^IUML%>e
!2019-01-18a!!!$ rö%{0äö%}d0%>e
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ r%{åöä%}%{0äö%}d%^IUML%>e
!2019-01-18a!!!$ r%{åöä%}%{0äö%}d0%>e
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"I-umlaut for long vowel in closed > open syllable"
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!! daal+N+Pl+Nom: __leahki/laakso/valley__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ daal%^VV2V%^IUML%>er
!2019-01-18a!!!€ dä0l00%>er
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ daal%^VV2V%^IUML%>er
!2019-01-18a!!!$ da0l00%>er
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!! book+N+Pl+Nom: __girji/kirja/book__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ book%^VV2V%^IUML%>er
!2019-01-18a!!!€ bö0k00%>er
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ book%^VV2V%^IUML%>er
!2019-01-18a!!!$ bo0k00%>er
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!! huus+N+Pl+Nom: __viessu/talo/house__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ huus%^VV2V%^IUML%>e
!2019-01-18a!!!€ hü0s00%>e
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ huus%^VV2V%^IUML%>e
!2019-01-18a!!!$ hu0s00%>e
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Double marking of umlaut for graphemes consisting of two different letters, ending in a:ä"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! a:ä <=> [ o: | u: ] _  Cns:* Vow:* Cns:* %^IUML: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Double marking of umlaut for graphemes consisting of two different letters, ending in u:y"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! u:y <=> o: _  Cns:* Vow:* Cns:* %^IUML: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Double marking of umlaut for graphemes consisting of two different letters, ending in u:ü"
!2019-01-18a!!! __ @RULENAME@ __
!2019-01-18a! u:ü <=> a: _  Cns:* Vow:* Cns:* %^IUML: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!! broak+N+Pl+Nom: __doadjin/katkaisu/break__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ broak%^IUML%>e
!2019-01-18a!!!€ bröäk0%>e
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ broak%^IUML%>e
!2019-01-18a!!!$ broak0%>e
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ broak%^IUML%>e
!2019-01-18a!!!$ bröak0%>e
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!"Umlaut for ua in Westphalian dialects"
!2019-01-18a!!! vuagel+N+Pl+Nom: __loddi/lintu/bird__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ vuagel%^IUML
!2019-01-18a!!!€ vüägel0
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ vuagel%^IUML
!2019-01-18a!!!$ vuagel0
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ vuagel%^IUML
!2019-01-18a!!!$ vüagel0
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!! boum+N+Pl+Nom: __muorra/puu/tree__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ boum%^IUML%>e
!2019-01-18a!!!€ böym0%>e
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ boum%^IUML%>e
!2019-01-18a!!!$ boum0%>e
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ boum%^IUML%>e
!2019-01-18a!!!$ böum0%>e
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ boum%^IUML%>e
!2019-01-18a!!!$ böüm0%>e
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"U-umlaut  %{aö%}:ö"
!2019-01-18a!!! __@RULENAME@__ 
!2019-01-18a!  %{aö%}:ö <=> _ %{0ä%}: Cns:* %^UUML: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!"Double marking of u-umlaut  %{0ä%}:ä"
!2019-01-18a!!! __@RULENAME@__ 
!2019-01-18a! %{0ä%}:ä <=> ö _ Cns:* %^UUML: ;
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!! blad+N+Pl+Nom: __lasta/lehti/leaf__
!2019-01-18a!!!€ bl%{aö%}%{0ä%}d%^UUML%>e
!2019-01-18a!!!€ blöäd0%>e
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ bl%{aö%}%{0ä%}d%^UUML%>e
!2019-01-18a!!!$ bl%{aö%}%{0ä%}d0%>e
!2019-01-18a!
!2019-01-18a!!!$ bl%{aö%}%{0ä%}d%^UUML%>e
!2019-01-18a!!!$ blö%{0ä%}d0%>e
!2019-01-18a!
"Short ablaut grade 1 in class 1  %{eiØ%}:i"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __
 %{eiØ%}:i <=> _ %{yaØ%}: Cns %^ABL1S: ;

"Second part %{yaØ%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__ 
 %{yaØ%}:0 <=> i _ Cns %^ABL1S: ;

!! ryden+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: __riidet/ratsastaa/ride__
!!€ r%{eiØ%}%{yaØ%}d%^ABL1S%>t
!!€ r0id0%>t

"Short ablaut grade 1 in class 2a %{eouü%}:ü"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __
 %{eouü%}:ü <=> _ %{0eua%}: Cns %^ABL1S: ;

"Second part %{0eua%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__ 
 %{0eua%}:0 <=> ü _ Cns %^ABL1S: ;

!! beden+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: __bivdit/pyytää/ask__
!!€ b%{eouü%}%{0eua%}d%^ABL1S%>t
!!€ bü0d0%>t

"Short ablaut grade 1 in class 2b  %{uüo%}:ü"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __
 %{uüo%}:ü <=> _ %{uaØ%}: Cns %^ABL1S: ;

"Second part %{uaØ%}:0"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __
 %{uaØ%}:0 <=> ü _ Cns %^ABL1S: ;

!! krupen+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: __čákŋat/ryömiä/creep__
!!€ kr%{uüo%}%{uaØ%}p%^ABL1S%>t
!!€ krü0p0%>t

"Short ablaut grade 1 in class 4a %{iaeo%}:i"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __
 %{iaeo%}:i <=> _ %{aeØ%}: Cns %^ABL1S: ;

"Short ablaut grade 1 in class 4a %{aeØ%}:0"
!! __ @RULENAME@ __
 %{aeØ%}:0 <=> i _ Cns %^ABL1S: ;
